Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.192

Urban agriculture zone.

(1) A city or town may, by ordinance, establish an urban agriculture zone within the boundaries of the city or town.

(2) To establish an urban agriculture zone, the city or town must conduct at least one public hearing on the question of whether to establish the urban agriculture zone.

(3) An ordinance adopted pursuant to this section must not prohibit the use of structures that support agricultural activity including, without limitation, apiaries, toolsheds, greenhouses, produce stands, and instructional spaces.

[ 2019 c 353 s 14.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 353: See note following RCW 43.23.300.